Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.801

Continuation of rules, pending business, contracts, investments, etc.

On the effective date of transfer as provided in RCW 41.50.030, all rules and regulations, and all pending business before any of the retirement boards whose powers, duties, and functions are transferred to the department by this chapter shall be continued and acted upon by the department.

All existing contracts and obligations pertaining to the functions herein transferred shall remain in full force and effect, and shall be performed by the department. None of the transfers directed by this chapter shall affect the validity of any act performed by a retirement board or by any official or employee thereof prior to the effective date of transfer as provided in RCW 41.50.030.

None of the transfers involving investment of funds by any of the retirement boards shall affect the validity of any act performed by such boards or by any official or employee thereof prior to the effective date of transfer as provided in RCW 41.50.030.

[1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 105 s 14.]